italian.aff
# particelle pronominali su imperativo
flag *H:

    # flag *H:
    # spegnere
    g n e r e       >    -ere,ilo
    g n e r e       >    -ere,ila
    g n e r e       >    -ere,ili
    g n e r e       >    -ere,ile
    g n e r e       >    -ere,ine
    g n e r e       >    -ere,imi
    g n e r e       >    -ere,igli
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iti
    g n e r e       >    -ere,ici
    g n e r e       >    -ere,imelo
    g n e r e       >    -ere,imela
    g n e r e       >    -ere,imeli
    g n e r e       >    -ere,imele
    g n e r e       >    -ere,imene
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iglielo
    g n e r e       >    -ere,igliela
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iglieli
    g n e r e       >    -ere,igliele
    g n e r e       >    -ere,igliene
    g n e r e       >    -ere,itelo
    g n e r e       >    -ere,itela
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iteli
    g n e r e       >    -ere,itele
    g n e r e       >    -ere,itene
    g n e r e       >    -ere,icelo
    g n e r e       >    -ere,icela
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iceli
    g n e r e       >    -ere,icele
    g n e r e       >    -ere,icene
    g n e r e       >    -gnere,nga
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamolo
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamola
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamoli
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamole
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamone
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamogli
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamoci
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamoglielo
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamogliela
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamoglieli
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamogliele
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamogliene
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamocelo
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamocela
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamoceli
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamocele
    g n e r e       >    -ere,iamocene
    g n e r e       >    -re,telo
    g n e r e       >    -re,tela
    g n e r e       >    -re,teli
    g n e r e       >    -re,tele
    g n e r e       >    -re,tene
    g n e r e       >    -re,temi
    g n e r e       >    -re,tegli
    g n e r e       >    -re,teci
    g n e r e       >    -re,tevi
    g n e r e       >    -re,temelo
    g n e r e       >    -re,temela
    g n e r e       >    -re,temeli
    g n e r e       >    -re,temele
    g n e r e       >    -re,temene
    g n e r e       >    -re,teglielo
    g n e r e       >    -re,tegliela
    g n e r e       >    -re,teglieli
    g n e r e       >    -re,tegliele
    g n e r e       >    -re,tegliene
    g n e r e       >    -re,tecelo
    g n e r e       >    -re,tecela
    g n e r e       >    -re,teceli
    g n e r e       >    -re,tecele
    g n e r e       >    -re,tecene
    g n e r e       >    -re,tevelo
    g n e r e       >    -re,tevela
    g n e r e       >    -re,teveli
    g n e r e       >    -re,tevele
    g n e r e       >    -re,tevene
    g n e r e       >    -ere,ano

    # flag *H:
    # nuocere
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,ilo
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,ila
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,ili
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,ile
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,ine
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,imi
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,igli
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,iti
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,ici
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,imelo
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,imela
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,imeli
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,imele
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,imene
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,iglielo
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,igliela
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,iglieli
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,igliele
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,igliene
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,itelo
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,itela
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,iteli
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,itele
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,itene
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,icelo
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,icela
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,iceli
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,icele
    u o c e r e     >    -ere,icene
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,occia
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamolo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamola
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamoli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamole
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamone
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamogli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamoci
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamoglielo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamogliela
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamoglieli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamogliele
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamogliene
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamocelo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamocela
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamoceli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamocele
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ociamocene
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetelo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetela
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,oceteli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetele
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetene
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetemi
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetegli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,oceteci
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetevi
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetemelo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetemela
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetemeli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetemele
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetemene
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,oceteglielo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetegliela
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,oceteglieli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetegliele
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetegliene
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetecelo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetecela
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,oceteceli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetecele
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetecene
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetevelo
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetevela
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,oceteveli
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetevele
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,ocetevene
    u o c e r e     >    -uocere,occiano

    # flag *H:
    # essere, riessere
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siilo
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siila
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siili
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siile
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siine
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siimi
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siigli
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siiti
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siici
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siimelo
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siimela
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siimeli
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siimele
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siimene
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siiglielo
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siigliela
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siiglieli
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siigliele
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siigliene
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siitelo
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siitela
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siiteli
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siitele
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siitene
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siicelo
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siicela
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siiceli
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siicele
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siicene
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,sia
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamolo
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamola
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamoli
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamole
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamone
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamogli
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamoci
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamoglielo
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamogliela
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamoglieli
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamogliele
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamogliene
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamocelo
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamocela
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamoceli
    e s s e r e     >    -essere,siamocele
