italian.dict
aborrire/ABDHKOSVY1
acconsentire/ABDHLPSVY1
acetire/ABDHKOSVY1
adsorbire/ABDHKOSVY1
affienire/ABDHKOSVY1
appartenere/ABDHKOSVY1
applaudire/ABDHKOSVY1
appratire/ABDHKOSVY1
aprire/ABDHKOTWY1
artefare/ABDHMQTWZ2
assorbire/ABDHKOSVY1
assuefare/ABDHMQTWZ2
astenere/ABDHKOSVY1
attenere/ABDHKOSVY1
autodefinire/ABDHKOSVY1
avere/1ABDHKOSVYa
avvertire/ABDHKOSVY1z
avviare/ABDHKOSVY1
bere/ABDHLPTWZ2z
bollire/ABDHKOSVY1
compartire/ABDHKOSVY1
condolere/ABDHKOSVY1
confare/ABDHMQTWZ2
conseguire/ABDHKOSVY1
consentire/ABDHLPSVY1
constare/ABDHKOSVY1
contenere/ABDHKOSVY1
contraffare/ABDHMQTWZ2
convertire/ABDHKOSVY1
coprire/ABDHKOTWY1z
cucire/ABDHKOSVY1
dare/ABDHKOSVY1
denutrire/ABDHKOSVY1
detenere/ABDHKOSVY1
deviare/ABDHKOSVY1
disciogliere/ABDHKOTWY1
discoprire/ABDHKOTWY1
disinvestire/ABDHKOSVY1
dissentire/ABDHLPSVY1
distogliere/ABDHKOTWY1
disvestire/ABDHKOSVY1
divertire/ABDHKOSVY1
dolere/ABDHKOSVY1z
dormire/ABDHLPSVY1
empire/ABDHKOSVY1
eseguire/ABDHKOSVY1
essere/1ABDHLPTWYa
fare/ABDHMQTWZ2zy
fuggire/ABDHKOSVY1
fuoriuscire/ABDHKOSVY1
fuoruscire/ABDHKOSVY1
giacere/ABDHKOTWY1
immusonire/ABDHKOSVY1
impietrire/ABDHKOSVY1
incagnire/ABDHKOSVY1
incaponire/ABDHKOSVY1
indolire/ABDHKOSVY1
inseguire/ABDHKOSVY1
intestardire/ABDHKOSVY1
intrattenere/ABDHKOSVY1
invertire/ABDHKOSVY1
investire/ABDHKOSVY1
inviare/ABDHKOSVY1
liquefare/ABDHMQTWZ2
malgradire/ABDHKOSVY1
malnutrire/ABDHKOSVY1
malservire/ABDHKOSVY1
malvestire/ABDHKOSVY1
mantenere/ABDHKOSVY1
mentire/ABDHKOSVY1
nuocere/ABDHLPSTVWYZ12
obliare/ABDHKOSVY1
offrire/ABDHNRTWY1z
ottenere/ABDHKOSVY1z
ovviare/ABDHKOSVY1
partire/ABDHKOSVY1
pentire/ABDHKOSVY1z
perseguire/ABDHKOSVY1
pervertire/ABDHKOSVY1
plaudire/ABDHKOSVY1
preavvertire/ABDHKOSVY1
prescegliere/ABDHKOTWY1
presentire/ABDHKOSVY1
prosciogliere/ABDHKOTWY1
proseguire/ABDHKOSVY1
putrefare/ABDHMQTWZ2
putrire/ABDHKOSVY1
rarefare/ABDHMQTWZ2
reinvestire/ABDHKOSVY1
riaprire/ABDHKOTWY1
riassorbire/ABDHKOSVY1
riavere/ABDHKOSVY1
riavviare/ABDHKOSVY1
ribollire/ABDHKOSVY1
riconvertire/ABDHKOSVY1
ricucire/ABDHKOSVY1
ridare/ABDHKOSVY1
ridisciogliere/ABDHKOTWY1
rieseguire/ABDHKOSVY1
riessere/ABDHLPTWY1
rifuggire/ABDHKOSVY1
ringhiottire/ABDHKOSVY1
rinvestire/ABDHKOSVY1
rinviare/ABDHKOSVY1
rinvilire/ABDHKOSVY1
ripartire/ABDHKOSVY1
risapere/ABDHLPSVY1
riscegliere/ABDHKOTWY1
risciogliere/ABDHKOTWY1
riscoprire/ABDHKOTWY1
risentire/ABDHLPSVY1
ristare/ABDHKOSVY1
ritenere/ABDHKOSVY1
ritogliere/ABDHKOTWY1
riuscire/ABDHKOSVY1
rivestire/ABDHKOSVY1
rivolere/ABDHKOSVY1
sapere/1ABDHLPSVYa
sbastire/ABDHKOSVY1
scegliere/ABDHKOTWY1
sciare/ABDHKOSVY1
sciogliere/ABDHKOTWY1
scoprire/ABDHKOTWY1
scucire/ABDHKOSVY1
seguire/ABDHKOSVY1z
sentire/ABDHLPSVY1
servire/ABDHKOSVY1
sfare/ABDHMQTWZ2
sfuggire/ABDHKOSVY1
soffrire/ABDHNRTWY1
soggiacere/ABDHKOTWY1
sopraffare/ABDHMQTWZ2
sostenere/ABDHKOSVY1z
sottacere/ABDHKOTWY1
sottostare/ABDHKOSVY1
sovvertire/ABDHKOSVY1
spegnere/ABDHKOTWY1
stare/ABDHKOSVY1
strabere/ABDHLPTWZ2
stupefare/ABDHMQTWZ2
susseguire/ABDHKOSVY1
svampire/ABDHKOSVY1
svestire/ABDHKOSVY1
tacere/ABDHKOTWY1
tenere/ABDHKOSVY1
togliere/ABDHKOTWY1
torrefare/ABDHMQTWZ2
trascegliere/ABDHKOTWY1
trasfigurire/ABDHKOSVY1
trattenere/ABDHKOSVY1
travestire/ABDHKOSVY1
tumefare/ABDHMQTWZ2
uscire/ABDHKOSVY1
vestire/ABDHKOSVY1
volere/1ABDHKOSVYa
